Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.172

Retirement pensions—Options—Election.

Before beginning to receive the retirement pension provided for in RCW 41.24.170, the participant shall elect, in a writing filed with the state board, to have the retirement pension paid under either option 1 or 2, with option 2 calculated so as to be actuarially equivalent to option 1.

(1) Option 1. A participant electing this option shall receive a monthly pension payable throughout the participant's life. However, if the participant dies before the total retirement pension paid to the participant equals the amount paid on behalf of the participant into the principal fund, then the balance shall be paid to the participant's surviving spouse, or if there be no surviving spouse, then to the participant's legal representatives.

(2) Option 2. A participant electing this option shall receive a reduced monthly pension, which upon the participant's death shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to the participant's surviving spouse named in the written election filed with the state board, however, in the event that the surviving spouse dies before the participant, the participant's monthly retirement allowance shall increase, effective the first day of the following month, to the monthly amount that would have been received had the participant elected option 1.

[ 1999 c 148 s 16; 1999 c 117 s 6; 1995 c 11 s 9; 1989 c 91 s 6.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 1999 c 117 s 6 and by 1999 c 148 s 16, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.